Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-731
Governor; duty to implement laws; exceptions; Attorney General; action to implement.

Pursuant to his constitutional duty to take care that the laws be faithfully executed, whenever it shall come to the attention of the Governor that any agency charged with the implementation of any act of the Legislature is failing to implement such act, he shall immediately in writing order the agency to commence implementation unless (1) the act shall have been held unconstitutional by final judgment of the Supreme Court, (2) the agency shall have been enjoined from implementation by court order, or (3) an action challenging the constitutionality of the act is pending in a court of competent jurisdiction. He shall furnish a copy of such letter to the Attorney General together with a written order to commence or cause to be commenced an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to compel implementation if the agency has not, within ten working days, commenced implementation. It shall be the duty of the Attorney General to comply with such order.

Laws 1978, LB 98, § 1.